Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 91.2, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 99, O.S.L. 2023 (20 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 91.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 91.2. A. To facilitate the trial and disposition of
cases, actions filed in the district court shall be assigned to
various dockets by the clerk of the court pursuant to the direction
and supervision of the presiding judge of the district. Until
changed by order of the Supreme Court, only the following dockets
are established: a civil docket, a criminal docket, a traffic
Req. No. 14457 Page 1

dock et, a probate docket, a child protection docket, a juvenile and
family relations docket, a small claims docket, and a business
docket for business court divisions of the court created pursuant to
Section 17 91.7 of this act title.
B. Whenever a district court establishes a drug court program
pursuant to the provisions of Sections 471 through 471.11 of Title
22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the judge presiding over the program
shall cause to be established a drug court docket. In those cases
assigned to the drug court docket, the judge shall determine what
information or pleadings are to be maintained in a confidential case
file which shall be closed to public inspection. The originating
criminal case file shall remain open to public inspection. Nothing
in this section shall prohibit the district attorney, defense
attorney, or the victim-witness coordinator from advising any victim
or other person regarding the assignment or disposition of a drug
court case.
C. Whenever a district court establishes a child protection
program, the presiding judge shall cause to be established a child
protection docket. Associate district judges or special judges
assigned to the child protection docket shall hear child protection
cases exclusively and shall be trained in child welfare law, child
trauma, and the foster care system. Uniform procedures shall be
implemented by the Administrative Office of the Courts for all child
protection dockets.
Req. No. 14457 Page 2

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14457 GRS 12/31/25





















Req. No. 14457 Page 3